Utah statutes.
70C-3-104.   Class actions.

(1)  In accordance with this section, a creditor may contract with the debtor of a closed-end consumer contract for a waiver by the debtor of the right to initiate or participate in a class action related to the closed-end consumer contract.

(2)  To contract for the waiver described in Subsection (1), the creditor shall disclose the waiver:

(a)  to the debtor;

(b)  in the closed-end consumer contract; and

(c)  for a closed-end consumer contract entered into on or after August 1, 2006, in:

(i)  bold type; or

(ii)  all capital letters.

